Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.123

Transfer of cattle by meat packer as sale.

The transfer of cattle owned by a meat packer from a feed lot to a slaughterhouse for slaughter shall be deemed a sale of such cattle for the purpose of chapter 16.67 RCW. Such packer shall pay directly to the beef commission the same assessment as required of all other cattle owners selling cattle.

[ 1971 c 64 s 1.]